Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2411.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 36, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-3603.03, to read: START_STATUTE13-3603.03. Coerced abortion; classification; definition A. A person commits coerced abortion if the person knowingly administers or gives an abortion-inducing drug to a pregnant woman without her knowledge or consent and with the intent to cause an abortion. B. Coerced abortion is a class 2 felony. C. This section does not prevent prosecution under any other law if the person commits coerced abortion and the use of the abortion-inducing drug causes the death of or bodily injury to the pregnant woman or an unborn child. D. For the purposes of this section, "abortion-inducing drug": 1. Means a medicine, drug or combination of drugs or chemicals or any other substance that is used with the intent of causing an abortion. 2. Includes the off-label use of drugs that are known to have abortion-inducing properties, such as mifepristone, RU-486, mifeprex, cytotec, misoprostol and methotrexate. 3. Does not include either of the following: (a) any drug that may be known to increase the risk of miscarriage but that is prescribed for other medical indications, such as chemotherapeutic agents or diagnostic drugs. (b) Contraceptives, emergency contraceptives or methotrexate when used to treat an ectopic pregnancy. END_STATUTE